Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1003
Bond election; petition; percentage of voters required.

No election, provided for in sections 12-1001 and 12-1002, shall be held until a petition therefor, signed by at least ten percent of the legal voters of such municipality, has been presented to the city council or board of trustees. The number of voters of the municipality voting for the office of Governor at the last general election prior to the presenting of such petition shall be deemed the number of voters in said municipality for the purpose of determining the sufficiency of such petition.

Laws 1957, c. 19, § 1(3), p. 151.